District of Columbia statutes.
38-825.02

Environmental Literacy Program.

(a)

An Environmental Literacy Program is established within the Office of the State Superintendent of Education. The Environmental Literacy Program shall:

(1)

Coordinate the efforts of the District Department of the Environment, the District of Columbia Public Schools, the Public Charter School Board, the Office of the State Superintendent of Education, the State Board of Education, the University of the District of Columbia, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of General Services, and the Department of Employment Services to triennially develop an environmental literacy plan for public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools;

(2)

Establish and convene an Environmental Literacy Advisory Committee, composed of community organizations, District government agencies, and other interested persons;

(3)

Collect data on the location and types of environmental education programs in public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools;

(4)

Provide environmental education guidance and technical assistance to public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools; and

(5)

Provide training, support, and assistance for environmental literacy programs in public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools.

(b)

The environmental literacy plan shall, at minimum, include the following:

(1)

Relevant teaching and learning standards adopted by the State Board of Education;

(2)

Professional development opportunities for teachers;

(3)

Suitable metrics to measure environmental literacy;

(4)

Suitable methods to increase environmental literacy;

(5)

Governmental and nongovernmental entities that can assist schools in the achievement of those goals; and

(6)

A proposed implementation method for the plan.

(c)

One year after December 17, 2014, and triennially thereafter, the Environmental Literacy Program shall issue a report about the state of environmental education in the District, plans for expansion, and recommendations for improving the program.

(d)

(1)

The Office of the State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”) shall establish a one-year pilot program to provide funds to employ environmental literacy specialists at selected District of Columbia Public Schools elementary schools and public charter elementary schools.

(2)

For the pilot program, OSSE shall make funds available for 4 environmental literacy specialists. Each environmental literacy specialist shall serve at 2 of the selected schools.

(3)

Only schools that have an existing school garden or plan to create a school garden with the assistance of an environmental literacy specialist may submit an application to participate in the pilot program. OSSE shall select 8 schools from among the applicants to participate in the pilot program.

(4)

Each environmental literacy specialist shall:

(A)

Create, if applicable, and maintain the school garden;

(B)

Implement composting and recycling programs;

(C)

Implement the 2012 environmental literacy plan developed pursuant to this section; and

(D)

Assist teachers with incorporating earth science into lesson plans.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 502, 57 DCR 4779
Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-37, § 2(j), 58 DCR 6841
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 311(b), 61 DCR 8045
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4102, 62 DCR 10905
D.C. Law 19-37 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-142 rewrote this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added (d).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Healthy Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-143, August 9, 2011, 58 DCR 6814).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4102 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(e) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that § 311 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.